src/fst/morphology/affixes/exceptional_declinations.lexc
!! inflectional types and analogue rules for nouns, adjectives and other declinables
!! VVS stands for Ü. Viks "Väike vormisõnastik" for reference purposes

!---------------
! pronouns
!---------------

LEXICON KES    ! kes, mis 

           +Sg+Nom:s # ;
  +Sg+Ade+Usage/Rare:%>l # ;    ! kel, mil 
                  : KEMISETO ;
                  :lle DE_PL ;    ! kellede etc 

LEXICON SEE    ! see 

                  :see SG_NOMINATIVE ;
         +Usage/Rare:se%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! sesse
  +Sg+Ine+Usage/Rare:se%>s # ;    ! ses
      +Sg+Usage/Rare:se%>st ELATIVE ;    ! sest
      +Sg+Usage/Rare:se%>l ADESSIVE ;    ! sel
      +Sg+Usage/Rare:se%>lt ABLATIVE ;    ! selt	
      +Sg+Usage/Rare:se%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;    ! seks
                  :se KEMISETO ;
               +Pl:nee%>d NOMINATIVE ;    ! need
                  :ne NENO ;

LEXICON TOO    ! too 

                  :too SG_NOMINATIVE ;
      +Sg+Usage/Rare:to%>sse ILLATIVE ;    ! tosse
  +Sg+Ine+Usage/Rare:to%>s # ;    ! tos
      +Sg+Usage/Rare:to%>st ELATIVE ;    ! tost
      +Sg+Usage/Rare:to%>l ADESSIVE ;    ! tol
                  :to KEMISETO ;
               +Pl:noo%>d NOMINATIVE ;    ! nood
                  :no NENO ;

LEXICON KEMISETO    ! kes, mis, see, too common cont. lexicon

               +Sg:lle STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;    ! kelle, tolle etc , excl Pl Nom
                  :%>da SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! keda, toda etc

! -----
LEXICON MASA    ! ma & sa 

             +Emph:ina SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! mina, sina
           +Sg+Nom:a # ;    ! ma, sa
             +Emph:inu SG_GENITIVE ;    ! minu, sinu
           +Sg+Gen:u # ;    ! mu, su
                  :in%>d SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! mind, sind
                  :u%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! musse
           +Sg+Ine:u%>s # ;    ! mus
               +Sg:u%>st ELATIVE ;
               +Sg:ul%>le ALLATIVE ;	! mulle
               +Sg:u%>l ADESSIVE ;	
               +Sg:u%>lt ABLATIVE ;	
           +Sg+Com:u%>ga # ;                  ! muga
          +Sg+Emph:inu LOCATIVES ;    ! minul, sinul
               +Sg:inu%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;
               +Sg:inu%>ni TERMINATIVE ;	  ! minuni
               +Sg:inu%>na ESSIVE ;	  ! minuna
               +Sg:inu%>ta ABESSIVE ;	  ! minuta
          +Sg+Emph:inu%>ga COMITATIVE ;    ! minuga
                  :ina LIK_DERIVATION ;    ! minulik, sinulik

LEXICON METE    ! me & te 

          +Pl+Emph:ie NOMINATIVE ;    ! meie, teie
           +Pl+Nom: # ;    ! me, te
          +Pl+Emph:ie GENITIVE ;    ! meie, teie
           +Pl+Gen: # ;    ! me, te
                  :i%>d PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! meid, teid
               +Pl:i LOCATIVES ;    ! meil, teil etc
               +Pl:ie%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;
               +Pl:ie%>ni TERMINATIVE ;	  ! meieni
               +Pl:ie%>na ESSIVE ;	  ! meiena
               +Pl:ie%>ta ABESSIVE ;	  ! meieta
               +Pl:ie%>ga COMITATIVE ;    ! meiega

   +Pl+Usage/NotNorm:ite GENITIVE ;    ! meite, teite
      +Usage/NotNorm:ite%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! meid, teid
   +Pl+Usage/NotNorm:ite LOCATIVES ;    ! meitel, teitel etc
   +Pl+Usage/NotNorm:ite%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;
   +Pl+Usage/NotNorm:ite%>ni TERMINATIVE ;	  ! meiteni
   +Pl+Usage/NotNorm:ite%>na ESSIVE ;	  ! meitena
   +Pl+Usage/NotNorm:ite%>ta ABESSIVE ;	  ! meiteta
   +Pl+Usage/NotNorm:ite%>ga COMITATIVE ;    ! meitega

                  :ie LIK_DERIVATION ;    ! meielik, teielik

LEXICON TEMA    ! ta 

             +Emph:ema SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! tema
           +Sg+Nom:a # ;    ! ta
             +Emph:ema SG_GENITIVE ;    ! tema
           +Sg+Gen:a # ;    ! ta
                  :e%>da SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! teda
          +Sg+Emph:ema LOCATIVES ;    ! temal etc
               +Sg:ema%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;
               +Sg:ema%>ni TERMINATIVE ;	  ! temani
               +Sg:ema%>na ESSIVE ;	  ! temana
               +Sg:ema%>ta ABESSIVE ;	  ! temata
               +Sg:ema%>ga COMITATIVE ;    ! temaga
                  :a%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! tasse
           +Sg+Ine:a%>s # ;                ! tas
               +Sg:a%>st ELATIVE ;
               +Sg:al%>le ALLATIVE ;	! talle
               +Sg:a%>l ADESSIVE ;	
               +Sg:a%>lt ABLATIVE ;	
                  :ema LIK_DERIVATION ;    ! temalik

LEXICON NEMAD    ! nemad 

          +Pl+Emph:ema%>d NOMINATIVE ;    ! nemad
               +Pl:a%>d NOMINATIVE ;    ! nad
                  :e NENO ;
                  :en%>de LIK_DERIVATION ;    ! nendelik

LEXICON NENO    ! nemad, need & nood common cont. lexicon

                  :n DE_PL ;    ! nende etc 
                  :%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! neid
               +Pl:n%>de%>ni TERMINATIVE ;	  ! nendeni
               +Pl:n%>de%>na ESSIVE ;	  ! nendena
               +Pl:n%>de%>ta ABESSIVE ;	  ! nendeta
               +Pl:n%>de%>ga COMITATIVE ;    ! nendega
      +Usage/Rare+Pl:i LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! neil etc 

! ----
LEXICON ISE    ! ise, iseenese NB! the usage info is possibly wrong...

                  :ise SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! ise
               +Sg:enese STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;    ! enese, enesel etc
    +Sg+Usage/Rare:enda STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;    ! enda, endal etc
                  :ennas%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;                               
       +Usage/Rare:en%>d SG_PARTITIVE ;                               
               +Pl:enes%>te STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;
    +Pl+Usage/Rare:end%>i STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;
                  :end%>i%>d PL_PARTITIVE ;
       +Usage/Rare:enese%>i%>d PL_PARTITIVE ;
                  :enese LIK_DERIVATION ;    ! (ise)eneselik

LEXICON OMAENESE    ! omaenese ; few forms; they could be regarded as parallel forms of 'ise'

         +Usage/Rare:enese SG_GENITIVE ;                      
                  :enda SG_GENITIVE ;                      
               +Pl:enes%>te GENITIVE ;
      +Pl+Usage/Rare:end%>i GENITIVE ;

! ----
LEXICON KÕIK

           +Sg+Nom: # ;
               +Sg:e%{W%} STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;    ! kõige etc
                  :e SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kõike
           +Pl+Nom: # ;    ! kõik
      +Pl+Usage/Rare:i%>de STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;    ! kõikide etc
               +Pl:i%{W%} STANDARD_GEN_ET_AL ;    ! kõigi etc
                  :i PL_PARTITIVE ;              ! kõiki

LEXICON MÕNI    ! only mõni; similar to MERI

                  :i SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :e N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! mõne etc
         +Usage/Rare:%>d SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! mõnd
                  :%>da SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! actually, mõnda is the preferred form...
                  :%>da SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! actually, mõnda is the preferred form...
         +Usage/Rare:e%{W%}%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! mõnesse 
                  :e DE_PL ;    ! mõnede etc
                  :e%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! mõnesid

! -----
LEXICON KEEGI    ! only keegi; (kes+gi); nonstandard parallel forms kellegil etc like REDEL

                  :e SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  : KEMISETO ;
   +Sg+Usage/NotNorm:llegi ALL_SEM_CASES ;    ! kellegis, 

LEXICON MISKI    ! only miski; mis+gi; nonstandard parallel forms millegil etc; miskid etc like REDEL

                  : KES ;
   +Sg+Usage/NotNorm:llegi ALL_SEM_CASES ;    ! millegis, millegil etc
      +Usage/NotNorm:ski 2C ;    ! miskid, miskite etc 


LEXICON KUMBKI    ! only kumbki; kumb like PIIM +gi; nonstandard parallel forms kummagil etc like REDEL

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :%{sg.a%} 1C ;
      +Usage/NotNorm:agi%{W%} 2C ;    ! kummagis, kummagil etc

!---------------
! exceptional inflectional types, i.e. covering very few words each
!---------------
LEXICON AED       ! only aed; if its orthography was aed - ajja - aeda, it would be in type PIIM
                  ! but aed - aia - aeda makes it too ugly to model with twol rules

                  :ed SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! aed
                  :ia%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! aia etc 
                  :eda SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! aeda
          +Usage/Hyp:ia%{W%}%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! aiasse 
                  :eda SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! aeda
                  :eda DE_PL ;    ! aedade etc 
                  :edu PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! aedu
         +Usage/Rare:eda%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! aedasid
                  :ia%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;    ! aialik

LEXICON ARGPÜKS    ! some compound words ending with püks (argpüks, vesipüks etc)
                  ! and declined not exactly like püksid (e.g. karupüksid, sukkpüksid) 
                  ! almost like TAUD, but has some less used pl forms
                  : TAUD ;
         +Usage/Rare:%{W%} TE_PL ;    ! argpükste etc

LEXICON ASI    ! only asi, paik, tiib, kõrv, mari

                  : PIIM ;
      +Usage/Rare+Pl:%{W%}%>u LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! asjus, paigus etc

LEXICON JALG    ! only jalg

                  : RIND ;
         +Usage/Rare:%>e N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! jalges etc

LEXICON KAEL    ! VVS 23  17 words; almost = PIIM, except pl gen + 

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :%{sg.a%} 1C_SG ;
                  : TE_PL ;    ! kaelte etc 
         +Usage/Rare:%{sg.a%} DE_PL ;    ! kaelade etc 
                               ! pl par stem vowel (u, i, 0) is lexically determined 
                               ! and usage-wise tagged
                  :%{sg.a%}%>%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR_VARIANT ;    ! kaelu, kaelasid+Usage/Rare

LEXICON KALLIS    !  VVS 7, 5 only kallis, kaunis unstable (closed) type; 

                  :s%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! kallis
                  :s%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;  ! kallist
                  : 2C_STRONG ;             ! kalli etc, kallite, kalleid, kalleil etc
                  : TE_PL ;                 ! kallite
         +Usage/Rare:s%{W%} TE_PL ;           ! kalliste etc 

LEXICON KAKS    ! only üks, kaks

                  :ks SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! kaks
                  :hT1%{sg.e%} 1C ;   ! like EIT
         +Usage/Rare:h%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kaht

LEXICON KANNEL    ! only kannel, tütar, kärbes, lemmel; = PIPAR, but stem vowel -e instead of -a

                  :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;      ! kannel
                  :%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kannelt
                  :%{W%} TE_PL ;              ! kannelde
                  :e 2C_STRONG ;
      +Usage/NotNorm:e TE_PL ;       ! kandlete, tütrete etc 
                  :e LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON KEEL    !  VVS 13 unstable (closed) type; 27 words

                  : VARS ;
       +Usage/Hyp+Pl:%{W%}%>i LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! vowel pl cases  keelil; except for some expressions (suuril silmil)

LEXICON KEVAD    ! only küps, kevad, = REDEL, but stem vowel is e

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! kevad
                  :e 2C ;    ! kevade etc

LEXICON KODU    ! only kodu; stem illative is koju, rare ablative is kodunt

                  :du SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :du N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! kodu etc; weak grade has no effect here
                  :du SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kodu
                  :ju SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! 
         +Usage/Rare:du%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    !  
      +Sg+Usage/Rare:dunt ABLATIVE ;    ! 
                  :du DE_PL ; 
                  :du%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;   
                  :du LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON KOHUS    ! only kohus-kohtu; like HOOLAS

                  :s%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! kohus
                  :%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kohut
         +Usage/Rare:%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kohtut
                  : 2C_STRONG ;    ! kohtusse etc
                  : TE_PL ;        ! kohtute

LEXICON KURAT    ! only kurat; like redel
   
                  :t SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! kurat
                  :di 2C ;    ! kuradi etc
